DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINTSYSTEM

DI-493

DI3QK-01

DTC

B0 130/63 Short in P/T Squib (RH) Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P/T squib (RH) circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and seat belt pretensioner (RH).
It causes the seat belt pretensioner (RH) to activate when the seat belt pretensioner (RH) activation condi-
tions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-2.

DTC B0130/63 is recorded when a short is detected in the P/T squib (RH) circuit.

* P/T squib (RH) malfunction
* Airbag sensorassembly malfunction

*Wire harness

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
* Shortcircuitbetween PR+ wire harness and PR - wire .
)  Seatbelt pretensioner (RH)
harness of squib )
B0130/63 * Airbag sensorassembly
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI-549)

-

2 [ Check P/T squib (RH) circuit.

PREPARATION:

P/T Squib (RH)

]

Airbag
Sensor
Assembly

X

H05166
H02141

H06823

@

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the con-
nector (on the airbag sensor assembly side) between the airbag
sensor assembly and the seat belt pretensioner (RH).
(See page DI-447)
CHECK:
For the connector (on the seat belt pretensioner side) between
the seat belt pretensioner (RH) and the airbag sensorassem-
bly, measurethe resistance between PR+ and PR -
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

NGéﬂto step5.
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:

P/T Squib (RH)
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(@)
(b)

(©)

Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
Using a service wire, connect PR+ and PR- of the con-
nector (on the seat belt pretensioner side) between the
airbag sensor assembly and the seat belt pretensioner
(RH).

Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

OK:

HINT:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO0 130/63is notoutput.

Codes other than code B0130/63 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

e )

Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 | Check P/T squib (RH).

P/T Squib (RH)

PREPARATION:

il

—_— e

Check Connector

H05168
AB0118 AB0119
R13006 H01082

Airbag
Sensor
Assembly

ACC ON

DTC B0130/63

H06825

(@)
(b)

(©
(d)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the seat belt pretensioner (RH) connector.
Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@)

Turn ignition switch to LOOK, and wait at least for 20 se-
cond.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

(f) Check DTC.

OK:

HINT:

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO0 130/63is notoutput.

Codes other than code B0130/63 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG > Replace seat belt pretensioner (RH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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5 Check floor wire harness.

PREPARATION:

Floor Wire Harness

_ (a) Disconnect floor wire harness connector on the airbag
Airbag sensor assembly side.
ED D:D :|Sensor i oo . .
pil Assembly (b) Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the
P/T Squib (RH) floor wire harness connector on the airbag sensor assem-
% bly side. (See page DI-447)

CHECK:
For the connector (on the floor wire harness side) between the
seat belt pretensioner and the floor wire harness, measure the
resistance between PR+ and PR-.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

hos169 HO6826 NG> Repair or replace floor wire harness.

OK

6 [ Check harness between airbag sensor assembly and floor wire harness.

. PREPARATION:
Floor Wire Harness . L . . .

_ Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the airbag

Airbag sensor assembly connector. (See page DI-447)

4:1] %:D Sensor CHECK:
Assembly e ) ]

P/T Squib (RH) % For the connector (on the floor wire harness side) between the
airbag sensor assembly and floor wire harness, measure the re-

sistance between PR+ and PR-.
OK:
Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

tween airbag sensor assembly and floor wire
harness.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector be-

H05170
HO02141 H06827

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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